test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ilves_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ilves: # Noun 'day / ilvekse' - full paradigm
     ilves+N+Sg+Nom: ilves
     ilves+N+Sg+Gen: ilveksen
     ilves+N+Sg+Acc: [ilves, ilveksen]
     ilves+N+Sg+Par: ilvesty
     ilves+N+Sg+Tra: ilveksekse
     ilves+N+Sg+Abe: [ilveksetä, ilveksettäh]
     ilves+N+Sg+Com: ilveksenke
     ilves+N+Sg+Ine: ilvekses
     ilves+N+Sg+Ela: [ilveksespäi, ilvekses]
     ilves+N+Sg+Ill: ilvekseh
     ilves+N+Sg+Ade: ilveksel
     ilves+N+Sg+Abl: [ilvekselpäi, ilveksel]
     ilves+N+Sg+All: ilveksele
     ilves+N+Sg+Ess: ilveksenny
     ilves+N+Sg+Ter: ilveksessäh
     ilves+N+Sg+Apr: ilveksellyö
     ilves+N+Pl+Nom: ilvekset
     ilves+N+Pl+Gen: ilveksien
     ilves+N+Pl+Acc: ilvekset
     ilves+N+Pl+Par: ilveksii
     ilves+N+Pl+Tra: ilveksikse
     ilves+N+Pl+Abe: [ilveksitä, ilveksittäh]
     ilves+N+Pl+Com: ilveksienke
     ilves+N+Pl+Ine: ilveksis
     ilves+N+Pl+Ela: [ilveksispäi, ilveksis]
     ilves+N+Pl+Ill: ilveksih
     ilves+N+Pl+Ade: ilveksil
     ilves+N+Pl+Abl: [ilveksilpäi, ilveksil]
     ilves+N+Pl+All: ilveksile
     ilves+N+Pl+Ess: ilveksinny
     ilves+N+Pl+Ins: ilveksin
     ilves+N+Pl+Apr: ilveksiellyö
     ilves+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: ilvesgi
     ilves+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: ilveksengi
     ilves+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [ilvesgi, ilveksengi]
     ilves+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: ilveksiägi
     ilves+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: ilvekseksegi
     ilves+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [ilveksetägi, ilveksettähgi]
     ilves+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: ilveksenkegi
     ilves+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: ilveksesgi
     ilves+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [ilveksespäigi, ilveksesgi]
     ilves+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: ilveksehgi
     ilves+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: ilvekselgi
     ilves+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [ilvekselpäigi, ilvekselgi]
     ilves+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: ilvekselegi
     ilves+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: ilveksennygi
     ilves+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: ilveksessähgi
     ilves+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: ilveksellyögi
     ilves+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: ilveksetgi
     ilves+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: ilveksiengi
     ilves+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: ilveksetgi
     ilves+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: ilveksiigi
     ilves+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: ilveksiksegi
     ilves+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [ilveksitägi, ilveksittähgi]
     ilves+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: ilveksienkegi
     ilves+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: ilveksisgi
     ilves+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [ilveksispäigi, ilveksisgi]
     ilves+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: ilveksihgi
     ilves+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: ilveksilgi
     ilves+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [ilveksilpäigi, ilveksilgi]
     ilves+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: ilveksilegi
     ilves+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: ilveksinnygi
     ilves+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: ilveksingi
     ilves+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: ilveksiellyögi
